Wyoming, session 2025, HB0078.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1.

(a) As used in this act:


(i) "Newborn child" means as defined in W.S.
14-11-102(a)(vi);
HB0078

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0507

(ii) "Newborn safety device" means a device
installed at a safe haven provider where a newborn child
can be safely placed and that alerts the personnel of the
safe haven provider that a newborn child has been placed in
the device;

(iii) "Safe haven provider" means as defined in
W.S. 14-11-102(a)(vii).

(b) The department of family services shall establish
and administer a grant program for the purpose of providing
grants for safe haven providers to purchase newborn safety
devices. The safe haven providers that receive grants under
this act shall manage the newborn safety devices. Each safe
haven provider shall receive not more than one (1) grant
and one (1) newborn safety device.

(c) The department of family services shall develop
an application process for safe haven providers to apply
for and receive grants to purchase newborn safety devices
and shall review applications to determine eligibility. Any
safe haven provider may apply for a grant under this
HB0078

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0507
section pursuant to the application process established by
the department of family services.

(d) The temporary grant program shall terminate June
30, 2026. Applications shall be received not later than
March 1, 2026. No grants shall be awarded under this
section after June 30, 2026.

Section 2. There is appropriated three hundred
thousand dollars ($300,000.00) from the general fund to the
department of family services for purposes of implementing
this act. This appropriation shall be for the period
beginning July 1, 2025 and ending June 30, 2026. This
appropriation shall only be used to make grants to safe
haven providers to purchase newborn safety devices, except
that not more than one percent (1%) of this appropriation
may be used for administrative expenses incurred pursuant
to this act. This appropriation shall not be transferred or
expended for any other purpose and any unexpended,
unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation on June
30, 2026 shall revert as provided by law.

HB0078

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0507
Section 3. The department of family services shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.

Section 4.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by subsection (b) of
this section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.

(b) Sections 3 and 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
HB0078